Hawaii, session 2026, HB653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to close or reclassify non-general funds of the department of land and natural resources, pursuant to certain recommendations made by the auditor in auditor's report no. 24-08, and to transfer any unencumbered balances to the general fund or other fund as recommended by the auditor. SECTION 2.  The assistance in managing land fund trust fund, administratively established in 2007, is closed.  Any unencumbered balance in the managing land fund trust fund shall lapse to the credit of the general fund. SECTION 3.  The donations, gifts, and grants from private and governmental entities trust account, administratively established in 1998, is reclassified as a trust fund. SECTION 4.  The land and natural resources natural physical environment special fund, administratively established in 2000, is reclassified as a trust account. SECTION 5.  The land division - water monitoring services trust account, administratively established in 1979, is reclassified as a trust fund. SECTION 6.  The native resources and fire protection program trust fund, administrative established in 2012, is closed.  Any unencumbered balance in the native resources and fire protection program trust fund shall lapse to the credit of the endangered species trust fund established under section 195D-31, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 7.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________